test/src/morphology/N-sarnnai_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - särnnai e-stem pöly: # Noun "speaker/puhuja"- full paradigm
     särnnai+A+Sg+Nom: särnnai
     särnnai+A+Sg+Gen: säärnai
     särnnai+A+Sg+Acc: säärnai
     särnnai+A+Sg+Ill: särnnʼja
     särnnai+A+Sg+Loc: särnnʼjest
     särnnai+A+Sg+Com: säärnain
     särnnai+A+Ess: säärnˈjen
     särnnai+A+Par: säärnˈjed
     särnnai+A+Sg+Abe: säärnaitää
     särnnai+A+Pl+Nom: säärnai
     särnnai+A+Pl+Gen: säärnʼji
     särnnai+A+Pl+Acc: säärnʼjid
     särnnai+A+Pl+Ill: säärnʼjid
     särnnai+A+Pl+Loc: säärnʼjin
     särnnai+A+Pl+Com: säärnʼjivuiˊm
     särnnai+A+Pl+Abe: säärnʼjitää
